Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1998.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 306(f.1)(1)(i) and 1603(e)(2) and (4) of the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, are amended to read:Section 306. The following schedule of compensation is hereby established:* * *(f.1) (1) (i) The employer shall provide payment in accordance with this section for reasonable surgical and medical services, services rendered by physicians or other health care providers, including an additional opinion when invasive surgery 123456789101112131415161718192021 may be necessary, medicines and supplies, as and when needed. Provided an employer establishes a list of at least six designated health care providers, no more than four of whom may be a coordinated care organization and no fewer than three of whom shall be physicians, the employe shall be required to visit one of the physicians or other health care providers so designated and shall continue to visit the same or another designated physician or health care provider [for a period of ninety (90) days from the date of the first visit]: Provided, however, That the employer shall not include on the list a physician or other health care provider who is employed, owned or controlled by the employer or the employer's insurer unless employment, ownership or control is disclosed on the list. Should invasive surgery for an employe be prescribed by a physician or other health care provider so designated by the employer, the employe shall be permitted to receive an additional opinion from any health care provider of the employe's own choice. If the additional opinion differs from the opinion provided by the physician or health care provider so designated by the employer, the employe shall determine which course of treatment to follow: Provided, That the second opinion provides a specific and detailed course of treatment. If the employe chooses to follow the procedures designated in the second opinion, such procedures shall be performed by one of the physicians or other health care providers so designated by the employer [for a period of ninety (90) days from the date of the visit to the physician or other health care provider of the employe's own choice]. Should the employe not comply with the foregoing, the employer will be relieved from liability for the payment for the services rendered [during such applicable 20250HB1998PN2532 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 period]. It shall be the duty of the employer to provide a clearly written notification of the employe's rights and duties under this section to the employe. The employer shall further ensure that the employe has been informed and that he understands these rights and duties. This duty shall be evidenced only by the employe's written acknowledgment of having been informed and having understood his rights and duties. Any failure of the employer to provide and evidence such notification shall relieve the employe from any notification duty owed, notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, and the employer shall remain liable for all rendered treatment. [Subsequent treatment may be provided by any health care provider of the employe's own choice. Any employe who, next following termination of the applicable period, is provided treatment from a nondesignated health care provider shall notify the employer within five (5) days of the first visit to said health care provider. Failure to so notify the employer will relieve the employer from liability for the payment for the services rendered prior to appropriate notice if such services are determined pursuant to paragraph (6) to have been unreasonable or unnecessary.]* * *Section 1603. Claims.* * *(e) List of providers.--* * *(2) If the fund establishes a list under paragraph (1), the fund shall be responsible only to reimburse expenses of medical treatments, services and accommodations rendered by the physicians or other health care providers that are 20250HB1998PN2532 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 designated on the list [for the period provided in section 306(f.1)(1) from the date of the employee's notice to the fund under subsection (b)].* * *(4) If the employee receives medical treatments, services or accommodations from a health care provider that is not designated on the list, the fund shall be relieved of liability for the payment of medical treatments, services or accommodations rendered [during the period provided in section 306(f.1)(1) from the date of the employee's notice to the fund under subsection (b)].Section 2. The amendment of sections 306(f.1)(1)(i) and 1603(e)(2) and (4) of the act shall apply to claims for which the date of injury is on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB1998PN2532 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516